Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB588.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 12.1(b) of the act of May 22, 1951 (P.L.317, No.69), known as The Professional Nursing Law, is amended to read:Section 12.1. Continuing Nursing Education.--* * *(b) Beginning with the license period designated by regulation, licensees shall be required to attend and complete thirty (30) hours of mandatory continuing education during each two-year license period. Nationally certified education courses 123456789101112131415161718 shall be considered as creditable, in addition to any other courses the board deems creditable toward meeting the requirements for continuing education. Continuing education in older adult abuse recognition and reporting is required as follows:(1) A registered nurse or licensed practical nurse seeking licensure renewal shall complete one (1) hour of the Board-approved mandatory thirty (30) hours of continuing education during the biennial period immediately preceding the application for renewal in accordance with this section in older adult abuse recognition and reporting, including, but not limited to, recognition of the signs of older adult abuse and the reporting requirements for suspected older adult abuse in this Commonwealth. Continuing education under this paragraph shall be approved by the department. The following apply to training required under this paragraph:(i) The Board may not renew a license of a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse who fails to verify compliance with this requirement. A registered nurse or licensed practical nurse whose license is not renewed by the expiration date of the biennial period may not engage in the practice of professional nursing until the older adult abuse continuing education requirement is satisfied and the license has been renewed, reinstated or reactivated.(ii) An applicant applying for initial licensure in this Commonwealth shall not be required to meet the continuing education requirement in this subsection on the first renewal immediately following licensure, except for mandatory continuing education in older adult abuse recognition and reporting required under this subsection.20250HB0588PN0597 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The Board may perform audits on registered nurses or licensed practical nurses to determine compliance with the older adult abuse continuing education requirements. A registered nurse or licensed practical nurse shall retain documentation of the registered nurse's or licensed practical nurse's completion of older adult abuse continuing education for at least five (5) years. A registered nurse or licensed practical nurse shall comply with a request for submission of documents verifying the registered nurse's or licensed practical nurse's completion of older adult abuse continuing education. For attendance at continuing education programs or courses, the registered nurse or licensed practical nurse shall retain the certificate of attendance provided by the program or course provider and submit the same to the Board upon request.(iv) A registered nurse or licensed practical nurse seeking to reinstate a lapsed license or reactivate an inactive license shall file an application for reinstatement or reactivation and submit, or cause to be submitted, documentation to demonstrate that the licensee completed the hour required in approved older adult abuse recognition and reporting within the biennial period immediately preceding application.(v) A registered nurse or licensed practical nurse seeking to reinstate a suspended license shall submit, or cause to be submitted, documentation to demonstrate that the registered nurse or licensed practical nurse completed the hour in approved older adult abuse recognition and reporting within the biennial period immediately preceding application for reinstatement.(vi) Older adult abuse continuing education hours may not be carried over from one biennial renewal period to the next.(vii) A registered nurse or licensed practical nurse may 20250HB0588PN0597 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 request a waiver of the older adult abuse continuing education requirement because of serious illness, military service or other demonstrated hardship. The registered nurse or licensed practical nurse shall submit the request and any supporting documentation to the Board in writing at least ninety (90) days prior to the registered nurse's or licensed practical nurse's license expiration date unless an emergency or hardship occurs within the ninety-day period. The Board shall grant, deny or grant in part the request for waiver.(viii) (A) Failure to complete the one-hour continuing education requirement on older adult abuse in accordance with this subsection shall be subject to the registered nurse or licensed practical nurse discipline under section 13(b) in accordance with the schedule of civil penalties in 49 Pa. Code § 43b.18a (relating to schedule of civil penalties-nurses). A second or subsequent violation shall subject the registered nurse or licensed practical nurse to discipline under section 14(a)(3).(B) A registered nurse or licensed practical nurse who has not completed the mandatory hour of older adult abuse continuing education shall make up the deficiency within six (6) months of receiving notice of the deficiency.(C) Notwithstanding any civil penalty assessed under clause (A), failure to provide the Board with documentation demonstrating the completion of one (1) hour of older adult abuse continuing education within six (6) months after receiving notice of a deficiency shall subject the registered nurse or licensed practical nurse to discipline under section 14(a)(3). (D) Failure to comply with an audit request for older adult abuse continuing education documentation may subject a 20250HB0588PN0597 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 registered nurse or licensed practical nurse to additional discipline under section 14(a)(4)(i).(2) (Reserved).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0588PN0597 - 5 - 12345